Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.028

Actions by the commission against a license—Petition for reinstatement.

This section does not govern actions taken under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(1) A licensee whose license has been suspended under this chapter may petition the commission for reinstatement after an interval as determined by the commission in the order. The commission shall hold hearings on the petition. The commission may deny the petition or may order reinstatement of the licensee's license. The commission may impose terms and conditions in the order of reinstatement.

(2) A licensee whose license has been suspended for noncompliance with a support order or visitation order under RCW 74.20A.320 may petition for reinstatement at any time by providing the commission a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the person is in compliance with the order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, the commission shall automatically reissue the person's license upon receipt of the release, and payment of a reinstatement fee, if any.

[ 2024 c 121 s 34.]